New York, session 2025-2026, A11353.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph c of subdivision 1 of section 13-0339-a of the 2 environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 312 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 c. Atlantic and shortnose sturgeon (Acipenser oxyrhynchus and brevi- 5 rostrum) until December thirty-first, two thousand [twenty-six] twenty- 6 nine, 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15000-01-6